InapariNouns.lexc
LEXICON NClasses
    Alienable ;
    Inalienable ;

LEXICON Alienable
{AL} Prefixes ;

LEXICON Inalienable
{IAL} Prefixes ;

LEXICON Prefixes
1sg.poss-:no ALSTEMS ;
1sg.poss-:no IALSTEMS ;

LEXICON ALSTEMS
nɨpɨro # ;

LEXICON IALSTEMS
pairi Suffix ;

LEXICON Suffix
ti # ;
   # ;
